Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-318.01
City clerk; city treasurer; offices combined; duties; salary.

Cities of the first class may by ordinance combine the offices of clerk and treasurer and provide for the payment of a salary to the person holding such combined offices. Such salary shall not be in excess of the maximum amount provided by law for the salary of the clerk in such city plus the maximum amount provided by law for the salary of the treasurer in such a city. When these offices are so combined, the duties of the treasurer shall be performed by the clerk.

Laws 1943, c. 41, § 1, p. 185;

R.S.1943, § 19-1601;

Laws 1945, c. 25, § 4, p. 136.